en: Firm cheese around 27% fat Maasdam-type cheese
fr: fromage type Maasdam 27% MG

en: Gouda
xx: Gouda
bg: Гауда
de: Goudas
es: Gouda
fi: Gouda
fr: Goudas
hr: Gauda
it: Gouda
ja: グーダチーズ, グーダ
lt: Gouda sūriai, gouda sūris
nl: Gouda, Goudse Kazen
pl: Gouda
ru: Сыр Гауда

en: Goudas with cumin
bg: Гауда с кимион
de: Goudas mit Kreuzkümmel
es: Goudas con comino
fi: gouda-juustot juustokuminalla
fr: Goudas au cumin
hr: Gauda s kuminom
it: Gouda con cumino
lt: Gouda sūriai su kmynais
nl: Goudse Komijnenkazen, Komijnenkaas, Komijnenkazen

en: Young Goudas, Young Gouda
de: Junge Goudas, Junger Gouda
fi: nuori gouda
fr: Goudas jeunes, Gouda jeune
hr: Mlade gaude
it: Gouda giovane
nl: Jonge Goudas

en: Young matured Goudas
nl: Jong belegen Goudas

en: Matured Gouda
de: Mittelalter Gouda
fi: Kypsytetyt Goudat
fr: Goudas mi-vieux
hr: Zrela gauda
nl: Belegen Gouda

en: Extra matured Gouda
nl: Extra belegen Gouda

en: Old Goudas
de: Alter Gouda
fr: Goudas vieux
hr: Stare gaude
nl: Oude Goudas

en: Extra old Goudas
de: Extra alte Goudas
fr: Goudas extra-vieux, Goudas de Noël
nl: Goudas extra oud, Overjarige Gouda

en: Young Goudas with herbs
nl: Jonge Goudas met kruiden

en: Beemster
xx: Beemster

en: Edam
xx: Edam
de: Edamer
hu: Edámi sajt
ja: エダムチーズ

en: Leerdammer
xx: Leerdammer
bg: Леердамер

en: Saint-Nectaire, Saint-Nectaire cheeses
xx: Saint-nectaire
de: Saint-Nectaire
fr: Saint-nectaire, Saint-nectaires, Saints-nectaires
hr: Saint-nectaire

en: Saint-Nectaire from milks collected in many farms, Saint-Nectaire cheese from cow's milk milks collected in many farms
fr: Saint-Nectaire laitier

en: Saint-Nectaire cheese from milk collected in an unique farm, Saint-Nectaire cheese from cow's milk milk collected in an unique farm
fr: Saint-Nectaire fermier

en: Unpasteurised cheeses
bg: Непастьоризирано сирене
ca: Formatges sense pasteuritzar
de: Rohmilchkäse
es: Quesos sin pasteurizar
fi: Pastöroimattomat juustot
fr: Fromages au lait cru, fromage au lait cru
he: גבינות בלתי מפוסטרות
hr: Nepasterizirani sirevi
it: Formaggi non pastorizzati
nl: Rauwmelkse kazen
pt: Queijos não pasteurizados

en: Buffalo cheeses, Buffalo's milk-cheese
bg: Биволско сирене
de: Büffelkäse
es: Queso de leche de búfalo
fi: puhvelinmaitojuusto
fr: Fromages au lait de bufflonne, Fromages de bufflonne
hr: Bivolji sirevi
it: Formaggio di bufala
ja: 水牛チーズ
nl: Buffelmelkkazen
pt: Queijos de búfalo

en: Thermised milk cheeses
de: Thermisierter Käse, Käse aus thermisierter Milch
fr: Fromages au lait thermisé
hr: Sirevi s termiziranim mlijekom
it: Formaggi al latte termizzati
nl: Gethermiseerde kaas

en: Cheeses with walnuts
de: Walnusskäse, Käse mit Walnüssen
es: Quesos con nuez, Quesos con nueces
fr: Fromages aux noix, Fromage au noix
hr: Sirevi s orasima
lt: Sūriai su graikiniais riešutais
nl: Notenkazen
pt: Queijos com nozes